Illinois, session 104th, SB2199.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5changing Sections 8.1 and 8.2 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 705/8.1)  (from Ch. 85, par. 508.1)7    Sec. 8.1. Full-time law enforcement and county corrections 8officers. 9    (a) No person shall receive a permanent appointment as a 10law enforcement officer or a permanent appointment as a county 11corrections officer unless that person has been awarded, 12within 6 months of the officer's initial full-time employment, 13a certificate attesting to the officer's successful completion 14of the Minimum Standards Basic Law Enforcement or County 15Correctional Training Course as prescribed by the Board; or 16has been awarded a certificate attesting to the officer's 17satisfactory completion of a training program of similar 18content and number of hours and which course has been found 19acceptable by the Board under the provisions of this Act; or a 20training waiver by reason of prior law enforcement or county 21corrections experience, obtained in Illinois, in any other 22state, or with an agency of the federal government, the basic 23training requirement is determined by the Board to be   SB2199- 2 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1illogical and unreasonable. Agencies seeking a reciprocity 2waiver for training completed outside of Illinois must conduct 3a thorough background check and provide verification of the 4officer's prior training. After review and satisfaction of all 5requested conditions, the officer shall be awarded an 6equivalency certificate satisfying the requirements of this 7Section. Within 60 days after the effective date of this 8amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly, the Board shall 9adopt uniform rules providing for a waiver process for a 10person previously employed and qualified as a law enforcement 11or county corrections officer under federal law or the laws of 12any other state, or who has completed a basic law enforcement 13officer or correctional officer academy who would be qualified 14to be employed as a law enforcement officer or correctional 15officer by the federal government or any other state. These 16rules shall address the process for evaluating prior training 17credit, a description and list of the courses typically 18required for reciprocity candidates to complete prior to 19taking the exam, and a procedure for employers seeking a 20pre-activation determination for a reciprocity training 21waiver. The rules shall provide that any eligible person 22previously trained as a law enforcement or county corrections 23officer under federal law or the laws of any other state shall 24successfully complete the following prior to the approval of a 25waiver:26        (1) a training program or set of coursework approved   SB2199- 3 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1    by the Board on the laws of this State relevant to the 2    duties and training requirements of law enforcement and 3    county correctional officers;4        (2) firearms training; and5        (3) successful passage of the equivalency 6    certification examination. 7    If such training is required and not completed within the 8applicable 6 months, then the officer must forfeit the 9officer's position, or the employing agency must obtain a 10waiver from the Board extending the period for compliance. 11Such waiver shall be issued only for good and justifiable 12reasons, and in no case shall extend more than 90 days beyond 13the initial 6 months. Any hiring agency that fails to train a 14law enforcement officer within this period shall be prohibited 15from employing this individual in a law enforcement capacity 16for one year from the date training was to be completed. If an 17agency again fails to train the individual a second time, the 18agency shall be permanently barred from employing this 19individual in a law enforcement capacity.20    An individual who is not certified by the Board or whose 21certified status is inactive shall not function as a law 22enforcement officer, be assigned the duties of a law 23enforcement officer by an employing agency, or be authorized 24to carry firearms under the authority of the employer, except 25as otherwise authorized to carry a firearm under State or 26federal law. Sheriffs who are elected as of January 1, 2022   SB2199- 4 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1(the effective date of Public Act 101-652) are exempt from the 2requirement of certified status. Failure to be certified in 3accordance with this Act shall cause the officer to forfeit 4the officer's position.5    An employing agency may not grant a person status as a law 6enforcement officer unless the person has been granted an 7active law enforcement officer certification by the Board.8    (b) Inactive status. A person who has an inactive law 9enforcement officer certification has no law enforcement 10authority.11        (1) A law enforcement officer's certification becomes 12    inactive upon termination, resignation, retirement, or 13    separation from the officer's employing law enforcement 14    agency for any reason. The Board shall reactivate 15    re-activate a certification upon written application from 16    the law enforcement officer's law enforcement agency that 17    shows the law enforcement officer: (i) has accepted a 18    full-time law enforcement position with that law 19    enforcement agency, (ii) is not the subject of a 20    decertification proceeding, and (iii) meets all other 21    criteria for reactivation re-activation required by the 22    Board. The Board may also establish special training 23    requirements to be completed as a condition for 24    reactivation re-activation.25        The Board shall review a notice for reactivation from 26    a law enforcement agency and provide a response within 30   SB2199- 5 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1    days. The Board may extend this review. A law enforcement 2    officer shall be allowed to be employed as a full-time law 3    enforcement officer while the law enforcement officer 4    reactivation waiver is under review. 5        A law enforcement officer who is refused reactivation 6    or an employing agency of a law enforcement officer who is 7    refused reactivation under this Section may request a 8    hearing in accordance with the hearing procedures as 9    outlined in subsection (h) of Section 6.3 of this Act.10        The Board may refuse to reactivate re-activate the 11    certification of a law enforcement officer who was 12    involuntarily terminated for good cause by an employing 13    agency for conduct subject to decertification under this 14    Act or resigned or retired after receiving notice of a law 15    enforcement agency's investigation.16        (2) A law enforcement agency may place an officer who 17    is currently certified on inactive status by sending a 18    written request to the Board. A law enforcement officer 19    whose certificate has been placed on inactive status shall 20    not function as a law enforcement officer until the 21    officer has completed any requirements for reactivating 22    the certificate as required by the Board. A request for 23    inactive status in this subsection shall be in writing, 24    accompanied by verifying documentation, and shall be 25    submitted to the Board with a copy to the chief 26    administrator of the law enforcement officer's current or   SB2199- 6 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1    new employing agency.2        (3) Certification that has become inactive under 3    paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) shall be reactivated 4    by written notice from the law enforcement officer's 5    agency upon a showing that the law enforcement officer: 6    (i) is employed in a full-time law enforcement position 7    with the same law enforcement agency, (ii) is not the 8    subject of a decertification proceeding, and (iii) meets 9    all other criteria for reactivation re-activation required 10    by the Board.11        (4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of this subsection 12    (b), a law enforcement officer whose certification has 13    become inactive under paragraph (2) may have the officer's 14    employing agency submit a request for a waiver of training 15    requirements to the Board in writing and accompanied by 16    any verifying documentation if the officer has at least 2 17    years of patrol experience after attaining certification. 18    A grant of a waiver is within the discretion of the Board. 19    Within 10 7 days of receiving a request for a waiver under 20    this Section, the Board shall notify the law enforcement 21    officer and the chief administrator of the law enforcement 22    officer's employing agency, whether the request has been 23    granted, denied, or if the Board will take additional time 24    for information. A law enforcement agency whose request 25    for a waiver under this subsection is denied is entitled 26    to request a review of the denial by the Board. The law   SB2199- 7 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1    enforcement agency must request a review within 20 days of 2    the waiver being denied. The burden of proof shall be on 3    the law enforcement agency to show why the law enforcement 4    officer is entitled to a waiver of the legislatively 5    required training and eligibility requirements. 6    (c) No provision of this Section shall be construed to 7mean that a county corrections officer employed by a 8governmental agency at the time of the effective date of this 9amendatory Act, either as a probationary county corrections 10officer or as a permanent county corrections officer, shall 11require certification under the provisions of this Section. No 12provision of this Section shall be construed to apply to 13certification of elected county sheriffs.14    (d) Within 14 days, a law enforcement officer shall report 15to the Board: (1) any name change; (2) any change in 16employment; or (3) the filing of any criminal indictment or 17charges against the officer alleging that the officer 18committed any offense as enumerated in Section 6.1 of this 19Act.20    (e) All law enforcement officers must report the 21completion of the training requirements required in this Act 22in compliance with Section 8.4 of this Act.23    (e-1) Each employing law enforcement agency shall allow 24and provide an opportunity for a law enforcement officer to 25complete the mandated requirements in this Act. All mandated 26training shall be provided at no cost to the employees.   SB2199- 8 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1Employees shall be paid for all time spent attending mandated 2training. 3    (e-2) Each agency, academy, or training provider shall 4maintain proof of a law enforcement officer's completion of 5legislatively required training in a format designated by the 6Board. The report of training shall be submitted to the Board 7within 30 days following completion of the training. A copy of 8the report shall be submitted to the law enforcement officer. 9Upon receipt of a properly completed report of training, the 10Board will make the appropriate entry into the training 11records of the law enforcement officer. 12    (f) This Section does not apply to part-time law 13enforcement officers or probationary part-time law enforcement 14officers.15    (g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 16the changes made to this Section by Public Act 101-652, Public 17Act 102-28, and Public Act 102-694 take effect July 1, 2022. 18(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 19103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-389, eff. 1-1-24.) 20    (50 ILCS 705/8.2)21    Sec. 8.2. Part-time law enforcement officers. 22    (a) A person hired to serve as a part-time law enforcement 23officer must obtain from the Board a certificate (i) attesting 24to the officer's successful completion of the part-time police 25training course; (ii) attesting to the officer's satisfactory   SB2199- 9 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1completion of a training program of similar content and number 2of hours that has been found acceptable by the Board under the 3provisions of this Act; or (iii) a training waiver attesting 4to the Board's determination that the part-time police 5training course is unnecessary because of the person's prior 6law enforcement experience obtained in Illinois, in any other 7state, or with an agency of the federal government. A person 8hired on or after March 14, 2002 (the effective date of Public 9Act 92-533) this amendatory Act of the 92nd General Assembly 10must obtain this certificate within 18 months after the 11initial date of hire as a probationary part-time law 12enforcement officer in the State of Illinois. The probationary 13part-time law enforcement officer must be enrolled and 14accepted into a Board-approved course within 6 months after 15active employment by any department in the State. A person 16hired on or after January 1, 1996 and before March 14, 2002 17(the effective date of Public Act 92-533) this amendatory Act 18of the 92nd General Assembly must obtain this certificate 19within 18 months after the date of hire. A person hired before 20January 1, 1996 must obtain this certificate within 24 months 21after January 1, 1996 (the effective date of Public Act 2289-170) this amendatory Act of 1995. Agencies seeking a 23reciprocity waiver for training completed outside of Illinois 24must conduct a thorough background check and provide 25verification of the officer's prior training. After review and 26satisfaction of all requested conditions, the officer shall be   SB2199- 10 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1awarded an equivalency certificate satisfying the requirements 2of this Section. Within 60 days after January 1, 2024 (the 3effective date of Public Act 103-389) this amendatory Act of 4the 103rd General Assembly, the Board shall adopt uniform 5rules providing for a waiver process for a person previously 6employed and qualified as a law enforcement or county 7corrections officer under federal law or the laws of any other 8state, or who has completed a basic law enforcement officer or 9correctional officer academy who would be qualified to be 10employed as a law enforcement officer or correctional officer 11by the federal government or any other state. These rules 12shall address the process for evaluating prior training 13credit, a description and list of the courses typically 14required for reciprocity candidates to complete prior to 15taking the exam, and a procedure for employers seeking a 16pre-activation determination for a reciprocity training 17waiver. The rules shall provide that any eligible person 18previously trained as a law enforcement or county corrections 19officer under federal law or the laws of any other state shall 20successfully complete the following prior to the approval of a 21waiver:22        (1) a training program or set of coursework approved 23    by the Board on the laws of this State relevant to the 24    duties and training requirements of law enforcement and 25    county correctional officers;26        (2) firearms training; and  SB2199- 11 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1        (3) successful passage of the equivalency 2    certification examination. 3    The employing agency may seek an extension waiver from the 4Board extending the period for compliance. An extension waiver 5shall be issued only for good and justifiable reasons, and the 6probationary part-time law enforcement officer may not 7practice as a part-time law enforcement officer during the 8extension waiver period. If training is required and not 9completed within the applicable time period, as extended by 10any waiver that may be granted, then the officer must forfeit 11the officer's position.12    An individual who is not certified by the Board or whose 13certified status is inactive shall not function as a law 14enforcement officer, be assigned the duties of a law 15enforcement officer by an agency, or be authorized to carry 16firearms under the authority of the employer, except that 17sheriffs who are elected are exempt from the requirement of 18certified status. Failure to be in accordance with this Act 19shall cause the officer to forfeit the officer's position.20    (a-5) A part-time probationary law enforcement officer 21shall be allowed to complete 6 six months of a part-time police 22training course and function as a law enforcement officer as 23permitted by this subsection with a waiver from the Board, 24provided the part-time law enforcement officer is still 25enrolled in the training course. If the part-time probationary 26law enforcement officer withdraws from the course for any   SB2199- 12 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1reason or does not complete the course within the applicable 2time period, as extended by any waiver that may be granted, 3then the officer must forfeit the officer's position. A 4probationary law enforcement officer must function under the 5following rules: 6        (1) A law enforcement agency may not grant a person 7    status as a law enforcement officer unless the person has 8    been granted an active law enforcement officer 9    certification by the Board. 10        (2) A part-time probationary law enforcement officer 11    shall not be used as a permanent replacement for a 12    full-time law enforcement officer.13        (3) A part-time probationary law enforcement officer 14    shall be directly supervised at all times by a 15    Board-certified Board certified law enforcement officer. 16    Direct supervision requires oversight and control with the 17    supervisor having final decision-making authority as to 18    the actions of the recruit during duty hours. 19    (b) Inactive status. A person who has an inactive law 20enforcement officer certification has no law enforcement 21authority.22        (1) A law enforcement officer's certification becomes 23    inactive upon termination, resignation, retirement, or 24    separation from the employing agency for any reason. The 25    Board shall reactivate re-activate a certification upon 26    written application from the law enforcement officer's   SB2199- 13 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1    employing agency that shows the law enforcement officer: 2    (i) has accepted a part-time law enforcement position with 3    that a law enforcement agency, (ii) is not the subject of a 4    decertification proceeding, and (iii) meets all other 5    criteria for reactivation re-activation required by the 6    Board.7        The Board may refuse to reactivate re-activate the 8    certification of a law enforcement officer who was 9    involuntarily terminated for good cause by the officer's 10    employing agency for conduct subject to decertification 11    under this Act or resigned or retired after receiving 12    notice of a law enforcement agency's investigation.13        (2) A law enforcement agency may place an officer who 14    is currently certified on inactive status by sending a 15    written request to the Board. A law enforcement officer 16    whose certificate has been placed on inactive status shall 17    not function as a law enforcement officer until the 18    officer has completed any requirements for reactivating 19    the certificate as required by the Board. A request for 20    inactive status in this subsection shall be in writing, 21    accompanied by verifying documentation, and shall be 22    submitted to the Board by the law enforcement officer's 23    employing agency.24        (3) Certification that has become inactive under 25    paragraph (2) of this subsection (b), shall be reactivated 26    by written notice from the law enforcement officer's law   SB2199- 14 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1    enforcement agency upon a showing that the law enforcement 2    officer is: (i) employed in a part-time law enforcement 3    position with the same law enforcement agency, (ii) not 4    the subject of a decertification proceeding, and (iii) 5    meets all other criteria for reactivation re-activation 6    required by the Board. The Board may also establish 7    special training requirements to be completed as a 8    condition for reactivation re-activation. 9        The Board shall review a notice for reactivation from 10    a law enforcement agency and provide a response within 30 11    days. The Board may extend this review. A law enforcement 12    officer shall be allowed to be employed as a part-time law 13    enforcement officer while the law enforcement officer 14    reactivation waiver is under review. 15        A law enforcement officer who is refused reactivation 16    or an employing agency of a law enforcement officer who is 17    refused reactivation under this Section may request a 18    hearing in accordance with the hearing procedures as 19    outlined in subsection (h) of Section 6.3 of this Act.20        (4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of this Section, a 21    law enforcement officer whose certification has become 22    inactive under paragraph (2) may have the officer's 23    employing agency submit a request for a waiver of training 24    requirements to the Board in writing and accompanied by 25    any verifying documentation if the officer has at least 2 26    years of patrol experience after attaining certification.   SB2199- 15 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1    A grant of a waiver is within the discretion of the Board. 2    Within 10 7 days of receiving a request for a waiver under 3    this section, the Board shall notify the law enforcement 4    officer and the chief administrator of the law enforcement 5    officer's employing agency, whether the request has been 6    granted, denied, or if the Board will take additional time 7    for information. A law enforcement agency or law 8    enforcement officer, whose request for a waiver under this 9    subsection is denied, is entitled to request a review of 10    the denial by the Board. The law enforcement agency must 11    request a review within 20 days after the waiver being 12    denied. The burden of proof shall be on the law 13    enforcement agency to show why the law enforcement officer 14    is entitled to a waiver of the legislatively required 15    training and eligibility requirements. 16    (c) The part-time police training course referred to in 17this Section shall be of similar content and the same number of 18hours as the courses for full-time officers and shall be 19provided by Mobile Team In-Service Training Units under the 20Intergovernmental Law Enforcement Officer's In-Service 21Training Act or by another approved program or facility in a 22manner prescribed by the Board.23    (d) Within 14 days, a law enforcement officer shall report 24to the Board: (1) any name change; (2) any change in 25employment; or (3) the filing of any criminal indictment or 26charges against the officer alleging that the officer   SB2199- 16 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1committed any offense as enumerated in Section 6.1 of this 2Act.3    (e) All law enforcement officers must report the 4completion of the training requirements required in this Act 5in compliance with Section 8.4 of this Act.6    (e-1) Each employing agency shall allow and provide an 7opportunity for a law enforcement officer to complete the 8requirements in this Act. All mandated training shall be 9provided for at no cost to the employees. Employees shall be 10paid for all time spent attending mandated training. 11    (e-2) Each agency, academy, or training provider shall 12maintain proof of a law enforcement officer's completion of 13legislatively required training in a format designated by the 14Board. The report of training shall be submitted to the Board 15within 30 days following completion of the training. A copy of 16the report shall be submitted to the law enforcement officer. 17Upon receipt of a properly completed report of training, the 18Board will make the appropriate entry into the training 19records of the law enforcement officer. 20    (f) For the purposes of this Section, the Board shall 21adopt rules defining what constitutes employment on a 22part-time basis.23    (g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 24the changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-694 this 25amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly and Public Act 26101-652 take effect July 1, 2022.   SB2199- 17 -LRB104 05863 RTM 15894 b1(Source: P.A. 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 103-389, eff. 1-1-24; 2revised 7-29-24.)